Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.905

Apportionment of funds.

If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by *RCW 41.80.901 through 41.80.904, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

[ 2002 c 354 s 320.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.80.901 through 41.80.904 were decodified pursuant to 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 479.